Hawaii, session 2026, GM1316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 201H-161, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
I. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) The corporation may make downpayment loans, either
directly or through a nonprofit organization as defined in
section 454F-1, to eligible borrowers who qualify for loans
under section 201H-162. The downpayment loan to any one
borrower shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the purchase price
or appraised value of the residential property or $60,000,
whichever is less. [In no event shall t-he--l-oan -amount and
purchase money mortgage amount e^eeed—one hundred per cent e#
combined loan-to-valuo.] The interest rate on the loans [may
r^nge-^^^em—©ne-^er—eent—eigfefe-^er—eent-T—depending on the
buyer' s—income.] shall be established by the corporation based
on federal program requirements and market conditions.”
2. By amending subsections (c) and (d) to read:
2026-3359 HB2270 CDl HMSO

■iiiHiiiiiiiiinn

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
’’ (c) The principal of the downpayment loan, together with
accrued interest, shall be due and payable upon the sale,
transfer, or refinancing of the property, or shall be repaid by
the borrower in installments as determined by the corporation;
provided that the corporation may provide a period in which
payments may be waived. The corporation may also forgive all or
a portion of the accrued interest, subject to terms and
conditions the corporation may establish. The period over which
the principal and interest shall be paid need not coincide with
the period over which the loan from the mortgage lender for the
balance of the purchase price must be repaid. The borrower may
repay the whole or any part of the unpaid balance of the
downpayment loan, plus accrued interest, at any time without
penalty.
(d) The corporation may secure the services of nonprofit
organizations, as defined in section 454F-1, as well as
financial institutions, mortgage lenders, or other qualified
loan originators, to originate the downpayment loans on behalf
of the State for an origination fee not in excess of the
prevailing loan origination fee amount, as determined by the
corporation."
2026-3359 HB2270 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniM

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 201H-162, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) No person shall be qualified for a downpayment loan
unless the person:
(1) Is a citizen of the United States or a resident alien;
(2) Is at least eighteen years of age;
(3) Is a bona fide resident of the State;
(4) Will physically reside in the residential property to
be purchased for the term of the loan;
(5) Is accepted by a mortgage lender as a person to whom
it is willing to lend money for the purchase of the
residential property provided the required downpayment
is made;
(6) Provides a portion of the downpayment^ which shall be
equal to [at least five] three per cent of the sales
price [7-] and may include any downpayment loan
assistance made available by the corporation under
this chapter; and
(7) Has successfully completed a homeownership counseling
program provided by a housing counseling agency
2026-3359 HB2270 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4 H.B. NO. g’l
C.D. 1
approved by the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development."
SECTION 3. Section 201H-163, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
” [-t] §2O1H-163 I|-] Restrictions on borrower. Every loan
made under this subpart shall be subject to the following
conditions:
(1) The borrower shall expend no portion of the borrower's
downpayment loan for purposes other than to [fftake]2_
(A) Make a downpayment for the purchase of a
residential property; or
(B) Pay for closing costs, prepaids, and reserves
pursuant to the purchase of the residential
property for which the downpayment loan is
provided;
(2) The residential property purchased with the
downpayment loan and mortgaged to the State to secure
the repayment of the loan shall not be sold or
assigned without the prior approval in writing of the
corporation and the first mortgage lender;
2026-3359 HB2270 CDl HMSO 4

Page 5 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) The borrower shall pay when due all taxes, liens,
judgments, or assessments that may be lawfully levied
against the residential property and all costs and
expenses of any foreclosure of the mortgage made to
the State;
(4) The borrower shall maintain fire and casualty
insurance in amounts equal to the replacement value of
all improvements and insurable portions of the
residential property with an insurance company
authorized to do business in the State. All proceeds
of that insurance shall be made payable to the first
mortgage lender and the corporation as their
respective interests may appear at the time of any
loss or damage. Subject to the rules of the
corporation, in the event of any loss or damage to the
improvements or property covered by the insurance, the
proceeds receivable by the State shall be applied
toward the reconstruction of the improvements or
property destroyed or damaged, unless otherwise
determined by the corporation on behalf of the State;
and
2026-3359 HB2270 CDl HMSO
■HNiiiiiiiniiniii

Page 6
H.B. NO. I’l
C.D. 1
(5) The borrower shall maintain the improvements in good
repair.
All of the conditions in paragraphs (1) through (5) shall
be a part of any downpayment mortgage executed under this
subpart, regardless of whether or not they are expressly
incorporated in the mortgage document."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3359 HB2270 CDl HMSO

lilllillllllillillllM

H.B. NO. 2270
I b
w
o
o b
APPROVED this Sth day of July , 2026
GOVEf^OR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2270, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2270, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
'reside] enate
Clerk of the Senate
102-26